dictionaries/hu/index.aff
SFX B e éitekéiben [^ae]e 21341
SFX B e éitekéibe [^ae]e 21342
SFX B e éitekéi [^ae]e 21343
SFX B e éitekéhez [^ae]e 21344
SFX B e éitekéből [^ae]e 21345
SFX B e éitekében [^ae]e 21346
SFX B e éitekébe [^ae]e 21347
SFX B e éiteké [^ae]e 21348
SFX B e éitektől [^ae]e 21349
SFX B e éitekről [^ae]e 21350
SFX B e éitekre [^ae]e 21351
SFX B e éiteknél [^ae]e 21352
SFX B e éiteknek [^ae]e 21353
SFX B e éitekként [^ae]e 21354
SFX B e éitekké [^ae]e 21355
SFX B e éitekkor [^ae]e 21356
SFX B e éitekkel [^ae]e 21357
SFX B e éitekig [^ae]e 21358
SFX B e éitekhez [^ae]e 21359
SFX B e éiteket [^ae]e 21360
SFX B e éiteken [^ae]e 21361
SFX B e éitekből [^ae]e 21362
SFX B e éitekben [^ae]e 21363
SFX B e éitekbe [^ae]e 21364
SFX B e éitek [^ae]e 21365
SFX B e éit [^ae]e 21366
SFX B e éiről [^ae]e 21367
SFX B e éire [^ae]e 21368
SFX B e éinél [^ae]e 21369
SFX B e éinkül [^ae]e 21370
SFX B e éinkéül [^ae]e 21371
SFX B e éinkéért [^ae]e 21372
SFX B e éinkévé [^ae]e 21373
SFX B e éinkével [^ae]e 21374
SFX B e éinkétől [^ae]e 21375
SFX B e éinkét [^ae]e 21376
SFX B e éinkéről [^ae]e 21377
SFX B e éinkért [^ae]e 21378
SFX B e éinkére [^ae]e 21379
SFX B e éinkénél [^ae]e 21380
SFX B e éinkének [^ae]e 21381
SFX B e éinkén [^ae]e 21382
SFX B e éinkéiül [^ae]e 21383
SFX B e éinkéiért [^ae]e 21384
SFX B e éinkéivé [^ae]e 21385
SFX B e éinkéivel [^ae]e 21386
SFX B e éinkéitől [^ae]e 21387
SFX B e éinkéit [^ae]e 21388
SFX B e éinkéiről [^ae]e 21389
SFX B e éinkéire [^ae]e 21390
SFX B e éinkéinél [^ae]e 21391
SFX B e éinkéinek [^ae]e 21392
SFX B e éinkéin [^ae]e 21393
SFX B e éinkéiig [^ae]e 21394
SFX B e éinkéihez [^ae]e 21395
SFX B e éinkéig [^ae]e 21396
SFX B e éinkéiből [^ae]e 21397
SFX B e éinkéiben [^ae]e 21398
SFX B e éinkéibe [^ae]e 21399
SFX B e éinkéi [^ae]e 21400
SFX B e éinkéhez [^ae]e 21401
SFX B e éinkéből [^ae]e 21402
SFX B e éinkében [^ae]e 21403
SFX B e éinkébe [^ae]e 21404
SFX B e éinké [^ae]e 21405
SFX B e éinktől [^ae]e 21406
SFX B e éinkről [^ae]e 21407
SFX B e éinkre [^ae]e 21408
SFX B e éinknél [^ae]e 21409
SFX B e éinknek [^ae]e 21410
SFX B e éinkként [^ae]e 21411
SFX B e éinkké [^ae]e 21412
SFX B e éinkkor [^ae]e 21413
SFX B e éinkkel [^ae]e 21414
SFX B e éinkig [^ae]e 21415
SFX B e éinkhez [^ae]e 21416
SFX B e éinket [^ae]e 21417
SFX B e éinken [^ae]e 21418
SFX B e éinkből [^ae]e 21419
SFX B e éinkben [^ae]e 21420
SFX B e éinkbe [^ae]e 21421
SFX B e éink [^ae]e 21422
SFX B e éinek [^ae]e 21423
SFX B e éin [^ae]e 21424
SFX B e éimül [^ae]e 21425
SFX B e éiméül [^ae]e 21426
SFX B e éiméért [^ae]e 21427
SFX B e éimévé [^ae]e 21428
SFX B e éimével [^ae]e 21429
SFX B e éimétől [^ae]e 21430
SFX B e éimét [^ae]e 21431
SFX B e éiméről [^ae]e 21432
SFX B e éimért [^ae]e 21433
SFX B e éimére [^ae]e 21434
SFX B e éiménél [^ae]e 21435
SFX B e éimének [^ae]e 21436
SFX B e éimén [^ae]e 21437
SFX B e éiméiül [^ae]e 21438
SFX B e éiméiért [^ae]e 21439
SFX B e éiméivé [^ae]e 21440
SFX B e éiméivel [^ae]e 21441
SFX B e éiméitől [^ae]e 21442
SFX B e éiméit [^ae]e 21443
SFX B e éiméiről [^ae]e 21444
SFX B e éiméire [^ae]e 21445
SFX B e éiméinél [^ae]e 21446
SFX B e éiméinek [^ae]e 21447
SFX B e éiméin [^ae]e 21448
SFX B e éiméiig [^ae]e 21449
SFX B e éiméihez [^ae]e 21450
SFX B e éiméig [^ae]e 21451
SFX B e éiméiből [^ae]e 21452
SFX B e éiméiben [^ae]e 21453
SFX B e éiméibe [^ae]e 21454
SFX B e éiméi [^ae]e 21455
SFX B e éiméhez [^ae]e 21456
SFX B e éiméből [^ae]e 21457
SFX B e éimében [^ae]e 21458
SFX B e éimébe [^ae]e 21459
SFX B e éimé [^ae]e 21460
SFX B e éimtől [^ae]e 21461
SFX B e éimről [^ae]e 21462
SFX B e éimre [^ae]e 21463
SFX B e éimnél [^ae]e 21464
SFX B e éimnek [^ae]e 21465
SFX B e éimmé [^ae]e 21466
SFX B e éimmel [^ae]e 21467
SFX B e éimként [^ae]e 21468
SFX B e éimkor [^ae]e 21469
SFX B e éimig [^ae]e 21470
SFX B e éimhez [^ae]e 21471
SFX B e éimet [^ae]e 21472
SFX B e éimen [^ae]e 21473
SFX B e éimből [^ae]e 21474
SFX B e éimben [^ae]e 21475
SFX B e éimbe [^ae]e 21476
SFX B e éim [^ae]e 21477
SFX B e éikül [^ae]e 21478
SFX B e éikéül [^ae]e 21479
SFX B e éikéért [^ae]e 21480
SFX B e éikévé [^ae]e 21481
SFX B e éikével [^ae]e 21482
SFX B e éikétől [^ae]e 21483
SFX B e éikét [^ae]e 21484
SFX B e éikéről [^ae]e 21485
SFX B e éikért [^ae]e 21486
SFX B e éikére [^ae]e 21487
SFX B e éikénél [^ae]e 21488
SFX B e éiként [^ae]e 21489
SFX B e éikének [^ae]e 21490
SFX B e éikén [^ae]e 21491
SFX B e éikéiül [^ae]e 21492
SFX B e éikéiért [^ae]e 21493
SFX B e éikéivé [^ae]e 21494
SFX B e éikéivel [^ae]e 21495
SFX B e éikéitől [^ae]e 21496
SFX B e éikéit [^ae]e 21497
SFX B e éikéiről [^ae]e 21498
SFX B e éikéire [^ae]e 21499
SFX B e éikéinél [^ae]e 21500
SFX B e éikéinek [^ae]e 21501
SFX B e éikéin [^ae]e 21502
SFX B e éikéiig [^ae]e 21503
SFX B e éikéihez [^ae]e 21504
SFX B e éikéig [^ae]e 21505
SFX B e éikéiből [^ae]e 21506
SFX B e éikéiben [^ae]e 21507
SFX B e éikéibe [^ae]e 21508
SFX B e éikéi [^ae]e 21509
SFX B e éikéhez [^ae]e 21510
SFX B e éikéből [^ae]e 21511
SFX B e éikében [^ae]e 21512
SFX B e éikébe [^ae]e 21513
SFX B e éiké [^ae]e 21514
SFX B e éiktől [^ae]e 21515
SFX B e éikről [^ae]e 21516
SFX B e éikre [^ae]e 21517
SFX B e éikor [^ae]e 21518
SFX B e éiknél [^ae]e 21519
SFX B e éiknek [^ae]e 21520
SFX B e éikként [^ae]e 21521
SFX B e éikké [^ae]e 21522
SFX B e éikkor [^ae]e 21523
SFX B e éikkel [^ae]e 21524
SFX B e éikig [^ae]e 21525
SFX B e éikhez [^ae]e 21526
SFX B e éiket [^ae]e 21527
SFX B e éiken [^ae]e 21528
SFX B e éikből [^ae]e 21529
SFX B e éikben [^ae]e 21530
SFX B e éikbe [^ae]e 21531
SFX B e éik [^ae]e 21532
SFX B e éiig [^ae]e 21533
SFX B e éihez [^ae]e 21534
SFX B e éidül [^ae]e 21535
SFX B e éidéül [^ae]e 21536
SFX B e éidéért [^ae]e 21537
SFX B e éidévé [^ae]e 21538
SFX B e éidével [^ae]e 21539
SFX B e éidétől [^ae]e 21540
SFX B e éidét [^ae]e 21541
SFX B e éidéről [^ae]e 21542
SFX B e éidért [^ae]e 21543
SFX B e éidére [^ae]e 21544
SFX B e éidénél [^ae]e 21545
SFX B e éidének [^ae]e 21546
SFX B e éidén [^ae]e 21547
SFX B e éidéiül [^ae]e 21548
SFX B e éidéiért [^ae]e 21549
SFX B e éidéivé [^ae]e 21550
SFX B e éidéivel [^ae]e 21551
SFX B e éidéitől [^ae]e 21552
SFX B e éidéit [^ae]e 21553
SFX B e éidéiről [^ae]e 21554
SFX B e éidéire [^ae]e 21555
SFX B e éidéinél [^ae]e 21556
SFX B e éidéinek [^ae]e 21557
SFX B e éidéin [^ae]e 21558
SFX B e éidéiig [^ae]e 21559
SFX B e éidéihez [^ae]e 21560
SFX B e éidéig [^ae]e 21561
SFX B e éidéiből [^ae]e 21562
SFX B e éidéiben [^ae]e 21563
SFX B e éidéibe [^ae]e 21564
SFX B e éidéi [^ae]e 21565
SFX B e éidéhez [^ae]e 21566
SFX B e éidéből [^ae]e 21567
SFX B e éidében [^ae]e 21568
SFX B e éidébe [^ae]e 21569
SFX B e éidé [^ae]e 21570
SFX B e éidtől [^ae]e 21571
SFX B e éidről [^ae]e 21572
SFX B e éidre [^ae]e 21573
SFX B e éidnél [^ae]e 21574
SFX B e éidnek [^ae]e 21575
SFX B e éidként [^ae]e 21576
SFX B e éidkor [^ae]e 21577
SFX B e éidig [^ae]e 21578
SFX B e éidhez [^ae]e 21579
SFX B e éidet [^ae]e 21580
SFX B e éiden [^ae]e 21581
SFX B e éiddé [^ae]e 21582
SFX B e éiddel [^ae]e 21583
SFX B e éidből [^ae]e 21584
SFX B e éidben [^ae]e 21585
SFX B e éidbe [^ae]e 21586
SFX B e éid [^ae]e 21587
SFX B e éiből [^ae]e 21588
SFX B e éiben [^ae]e 21589
SFX B e éibe [^ae]e 21590
SFX B e éi [^ae]e 21591
SFX B e édül [^ae]e 22097
SFX B e édéül [^ae]e 22099
SFX B e édéért [^ae]e 22100
SFX B e édévé [^ae]e 22101
SFX B e édével [^ae]e 22102
SFX B e édétől [^ae]e 22103
SFX B e édét [^ae]e 22104
SFX B e édéről [^ae]e 22105
SFX B e édért [^ae]e 22106
SFX B e édére [^ae]e 22107
SFX B e édénél [^ae]e 22108
SFX B e édének [^ae]e 22109
SFX B e édén [^ae]e 22110
SFX B e édékül [^ae]e 22504
SFX B e édékéül [^ae]e 22505
SFX B e édékéért [^ae]e 22506
SFX B e édékévé [^ae]e 22507
SFX B e édékével [^ae]e 22508
SFX B e édékétől [^ae]e 22509
SFX B e édékét [^ae]e 22510
SFX B e édékéről [^ae]e 22511
SFX B e édékért [^ae]e 22512
SFX B e édékére [^ae]e 22513
SFX B e édékénél [^ae]e 22514
SFX B e édékének [^ae]e 22515
SFX B e édékén [^ae]e 22516
SFX B e édékéiül [^ae]e 22517
SFX B e édékéiért [^ae]e 22518
SFX B e édékéivé [^ae]e 22519
SFX B e édékéivel [^ae]e 22520
SFX B e édékéitől [^ae]e 22521
SFX B e édékéit [^ae]e 22522
SFX B e édékéiről [^ae]e 22523
SFX B e édékéire [^ae]e 22524
SFX B e édékéinél [^ae]e 22525
SFX B e édékéinek [^ae]e 22526
SFX B e édékéin [^ae]e 22527
SFX B e édékéiig [^ae]e 22528
SFX B e édékéihez [^ae]e 22529
SFX B e édékéig [^ae]e 22530
SFX B e édékéiből [^ae]e 22531
SFX B e édékéiben [^ae]e 22532
SFX B e édékéibe [^ae]e 22533
SFX B e édékéi [^ae]e 22534
SFX B e édékéhez [^ae]e 22535
SFX B e édékéből [^ae]e 22536
SFX B e édékében [^ae]e 22537
SFX B e édékébe [^ae]e 22538
SFX B e édéké [^ae]e 22539
SFX B e édéktől [^ae]e 22540
SFX B e édékről [^ae]e 22541
SFX B e édékre [^ae]e 22542
SFX B e édéknél [^ae]e 22543
SFX B e édéknek [^ae]e 22544
SFX B e édékké [^ae]e 22545
SFX B e édékkel [^ae]e 22546
SFX B e édékig [^ae]e 22547
SFX B e édékhez [^ae]e 22548
SFX B e édéket [^ae]e 22549
SFX B e édéken [^ae]e 22550
SFX B e édékből [^ae]e 22551
SFX B e édékben [^ae]e 22552
SFX B e édékbe [^ae]e 22553
SFX B e édék [^ae]e 22111
SFX B e édéiül [^ae]e 22112
SFX B e édéiért [^ae]e 22113
SFX B e édéivé [^ae]e 22114
SFX B e édéivel [^ae]e 22115
SFX B e édéitől [^ae]e 22116
SFX B e édéit [^ae]e 22117
SFX B e édéiről [^ae]e 22118
SFX B e édéire [^ae]e 22119
SFX B e édéinél [^ae]e 22120
SFX B e édéinek [^ae]e 22121
SFX B e édéin [^ae]e 22122
SFX B e édéiig [^ae]e 22123
SFX B e édéihez [^ae]e 22124
SFX B e édéig [^ae]e 22125
SFX B e édéiből [^ae]e 22126
SFX B e édéiben [^ae]e 22127
SFX B e édéibe [^ae]e 22128
SFX B e édéi [^ae]e 22129
SFX B e édéhez [^ae]e 22130
SFX B e édéből [^ae]e 22131
SFX B e édében [^ae]e 22132
SFX B e édébe [^ae]e 22133
SFX B e édé [^ae]e 22134
SFX B e édtől [^ae]e 22135
SFX B e édről [^ae]e 22136
SFX B e édre [^ae]e 22137
SFX B e édnél [^ae]e 22138
SFX B e édnek [^ae]e 22139
SFX B e édként [^ae]e 22140
SFX B e édkor [^ae]e 22141
SFX B e édig [^ae]e 22142
SFX B e édhez [^ae]e 22143
SFX B e édet [^ae]e 22144
SFX B e éden [^ae]e 22098
SFX B e éddé [^ae]e 22145
SFX B e éddel [^ae]e 22146
SFX B e édből [^ae]e 22147
SFX B e édben [^ae]e 22148
SFX B e édbe [^ae]e 22149
SFX B e éd/1246 [^ae]e 22144
SFX B e éd [^ae]e 22150
SFX B 0 éül [áéiíóőuúüűy-] 21640
SFX B 0 éül [ae]e 21640
SFX B 0 éért [áéiíóőuúüűy-] 21641
SFX B 0 éért [ae]e 21641
SFX B 0 évé [áéiíóőuúüűy-] 21642
SFX B 0 évé [ae]e 21642
SFX B 0 ével [áéiíóőuúüűy-] 21643
SFX B 0 ével [ae]e 21643
SFX B 0 étől [áéiíóőuúüűy-] 21644
SFX B 0 étől [ae]e 21644
SFX B 0 ét [áéiíóőuúüűy-] 21645
SFX B 0 ét [ae]e 21645
SFX B 0 éről [áéiíóőuúüűy-] 21646
SFX B 0 éről [ae]e 21646
SFX B 0 ére [áéiíóőuúüűy-] 21648
SFX B 0 ére [ae]e 21648
SFX B 0 énél [áéiíóőuúüűy-] 21649
SFX B 0 énél [ae]e 21649
SFX B 0 ének [áéiíóőuúüűy-] 21650
SFX B 0 ének [ae]e 21650
SFX B 0 én [áéiíóőuúüűy-] 21651
SFX B 0 én [ae]e 21651
SFX B 0 ékül [áéiíóőuúüűy-] 22151
SFX B 0 ékül [ae]e 22151
SFX B 0 ékéül [áéiíóőuúüűy-] 22152
SFX B 0 ékéül [ae]e 22152
SFX B 0 ékéért [áéiíóőuúüűy-] 22153
SFX B 0 ékéért [ae]e 22153
SFX B 0 ékévé [áéiíóőuúüűy-] 22154
SFX B 0 ékévé [ae]e 22154
SFX B 0 ékével [áéiíóőuúüűy-] 22155
SFX B 0 ékével [ae]e 22155
SFX B 0 ékétől [áéiíóőuúüűy-] 22156
SFX B 0 ékétől [ae]e 22156
SFX B 0 ékét [áéiíóőuúüűy-] 22157
SFX B 0 ékét [ae]e 22157
SFX B 0 ékéről [áéiíóőuúüűy-] 22158
SFX B 0 ékéről [ae]e 22158
SFX B 0 ékért [áéiíóőuúüűy-] 22159
SFX B 0 ékért [ae]e 22159
SFX B 0 ékére [áéiíóőuúüűy-] 22160
SFX B 0 ékére [ae]e 22160
SFX B 0 ékénél [áéiíóőuúüűy-] 22161
SFX B 0 ékénél [ae]e 22161
SFX B 0 ékének [áéiíóőuúüűy-] 22162
SFX B 0 ékének [ae]e 22162
SFX B 0 ékén [áéiíóőuúüűy-] 22163
SFX B 0 ékén [ae]e 22163
SFX B 0 ékéiül [áéiíóőuúüűy-] 22164
SFX B 0 ékéiül [ae]e 22164
SFX B 0 ékéiért [áéiíóőuúüűy-] 22165
SFX B 0 ékéiért [ae]e 22165
SFX B 0 ékéivé [áéiíóőuúüűy-] 22166
SFX B 0 ékéivé [ae]e 22166
SFX B 0 ékéivel [áéiíóőuúüűy-] 22167
SFX B 0 ékéivel [ae]e 22167
SFX B 0 ékéitől [áéiíóőuúüűy-] 22168
SFX B 0 ékéitől [ae]e 22168
SFX B 0 ékéit [áéiíóőuúüűy-] 22169
SFX B 0 ékéit [ae]e 22169
